Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.230

Correctional facilities construction and repair—Alternative contracting method to remain in force until contracts completed.

Methods of public works contracting authorized by RCW 39.04.210 and 39.04.220 shall remain in full force and effect until completion of projects authorized on or before July 1, 1997.

[ 1994 c 80 s 3; 1991 c 130 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 80: See notes following RCW 39.04.210.

Severability—1991 c 130: See note following RCW 39.04.210.